District of Columbia statutes.
32-1306

Enforcement, records and subpoenas.

(a)

(1)

The Mayor shall enforce and administer the provisions of this chapter, the Living Wage Act, the Sick and Safe Leave Act, and the Minimum Wage Revision Act, including conducting investigations of any violations and holding hearings and instituting actions for penalties. Any and all prosecutions of violations of this chapter, the Living Wage Act, the Minimum Wage Revision Act, or the Sick and Safe Leave Act undertaken in court shall be conducted in the name of the District of Columbia by the Office of the Attorney General.

(2)

This subsection shall not be construed to affect investigations of the Minimum Wage Revision Act.

(a-1)

The Mayor shall encourage reporting pursuant to this section by keeping confidential, to the maximum extent permitted by applicable laws, the name and other identifying information of the employee or other person reporting a violation during the course of any investigation; provided, that with the authorization of such person, the Mayor may disclose the employee or person’s name and identifying information as necessary to conduct a hearing and enforce this chapter or other employee protection laws, including the Living Wage Act, the Minimum Wage Revision Act, or the Sick and Safe Leave Act.

(b)

The Mayor shall have power to administer oaths and examine witnesses under oath, issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses, and the production of papers, books, accounts, records, payrolls, documents, and testimony and to take depositions and affidavits in any proceedings before him.

(c)

In case of failure of any person to comply with any subpoena lawfully issued, or on the refusal of any witness to testify to any matter regarding which he may be lawfully interrogated, it shall be the duty of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia or any judge thereof, on application by the Mayor, to compel obedience by attachment proceedings for contempt, as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from such Court or a refusal to testify therein.

History

Aug. 3, 1956, 70 Stat. 977, ch. 924, § 6
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 2062(d), 60 DCR 12472
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-157, § 2(d), 61 DCR 10157

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-106.
1973 Ed., § 36-606.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61, in (a), substituted “for the payment of wages, liquidated damages, and penalties” for “for penalties” and added the last sentence.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-157 rewrote (a); and added (a-1).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-240, March 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1332).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2062(d) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2062(d) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 2(c) of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-544, Dec. 29, 2014, 62 DCR 243, 20 STAT 4458).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-188, Oct. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 14224).

Short Title

Section 2061 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle G of Title II of the act may be cited as the “Wage Theft Prevention Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-157: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-157 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014, and that the act shall apply to violations occurring after October 1, 2014.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.